apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="poe/ta__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ta<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="BASE__poeta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tów</l>       <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tom</l>       <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tów</l>       <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tami</l>      <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tach</l>      <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__artysta">
  <e>       <p><l>ście</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ście</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r></r></p><par n="PBASE__mężczyzna"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="zwierz/ę__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ę</l>         <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęcia</l>      <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę</l>         <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciem</l>     <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęciu</l>      <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęta</l>       <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ąt</l>        <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ętom</l>      <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęta</l>       <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ętami</l>     <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ętach</l>     <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ęta</l>       <r>ę<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ojc/iec__n">
  <e>       <p><l>iec</l>       <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ze</l>        <r>iec<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>iec<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__mp_pl"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__astronom">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="mp"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__astronom_sg"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="PBASE__mp_pl"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__kretyn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="mp"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__astronom_sg"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="PBASE__chłop_pl"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__rekin">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ma"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__astronom_sg"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ma"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__bat_pl"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__chłop">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="PBASE__chłop_sg"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="PBASE__chłop_pl"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="astronom__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/></r></p><par n="BASE__astronom"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Adam__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r></p><par n="BASE__astronom"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Chopin__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/></r></p><par n="BASE__astronom"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kretyn__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kretyn"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rekin__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/></r></p><par n="BASE__rekin"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ob/óz__n">
  <e>       <p><l>óz</l>        <r>óz<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozu</l>       <r>óz<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozowi</l>     <r>óz<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>óz</l>        <r>óz<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozem</l>      <r>óz<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozie</l>      <r>óz<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ozie</l>      <r>óz<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oz</l>        <r>óz<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__bat_pl"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cudzysł/ów__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ów</l>        <r>ów<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owu</l>       <r>ów<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owowi</l>     <r>ów<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ów</l>        <r>ów<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owem</l>      <r>ów<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owie</l>      <r>ów<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owie</l>      <r>ów<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ow</l>        <r>ów<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__bat_pl"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="robo/t__n">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>towi</l>      <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tem</l>       <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cie</l>       <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cie</l>       <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__bat_pl"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="archeopteryks">   <i>archeopteryks</i><par n="rekin__n"/></e>
<e lm="arcykapłan">      <i>arcykapłan</i><par n="kretyn__n"/></e>
<e lm="arystokrata">     <i>arystokra</i><par n="poe/ta__n"/></e>
<e lm="astronauta">      <i>astronau</i><par n="poe/ta__n"/></e>
<e lm="astronom">        <i>astronom</i><par n="astronom__n"/></e>
<e lm="autodydakta">     <i>autodydak</i><par n="poe/ta__n"/></e>
<e lm="baran">           <i>baran</i><par n="rekin__n"/></e>
<e lm="bażant">          <i>bażan</i><par n="robo/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="biograf">         <i>biograf</i><par n="astronom__n"/></e>
<e lm="biznesmen">       <i>biznesmen</i><par n="kretyn__n"/></e>
<e lm="brudas">          <i>brudas</i><par n="rekin__n"/></e>
<e lm="bydlę">           <i>bydl</i><par n="zwierz/ę__n"/></e>
<e lm="chart">           <i>char</i><par n="robo/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="chytrus">         <i>chytrus</i><par n="kretyn__n"/></e>
<e lm="cielę">           <i>ciel</i><par n="zwierz/ę__n"/></e>
<e lm="cudzysłów">       <i>cudzysł</i><par n="cudzysł/ów__n"/></e>
<e lm="demokrata">       <i>demokra</i><par n="poe/ta__n"/></e>
<e lm="despota">         <i>despo</i><par n="poe/ta__n"/></e>
<e lm="dyplomata">       <i>dyploma</i><par n="poe/ta__n"/></e>
<e lm="dziekan">         <i>dziekan</i><par n="kretyn__n"/></e>
<e lm="dziewczę">        <i>dziewcz</i><par n="zwierz/ę__n"/></e>
<e lm="fan">             <i>fan</i><par n="kretyn__n"/></e>
<e lm="fiat">            <i>fia</i><par n="robo/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="filozof">         <i>filozof</i><par n="astronom__n"/></e>
<e lm="funt">            <i>fun</i><par n="robo/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="gem">             <i>gem</i><par n="rekin__n"/></e>
<e lm="geograf">         <i>geograf</i><par n="astronom__n"/></e>
<e lm="hipokryta">       <i>hipokry</i><par n="poe/ta__n"/></e>
<e lm="imiesłów">        <i>imiesł</i><par n="cudzysł/ów__n"/></e>
<e lm="jagnię">          <i>jagni</i><par n="zwierz/ę__n"/></e>
<e lm="kameleon">        <i>kameleon</i><par n="rekin__n"/></e>
<e lm="kapitan">         <i>kapitan</i><par n="astronom__n"/></e>
<e lm="kapłan">          <i>kapłan</i><par n="kretyn__n"/></e>
<e lm="kot">             <i>ko</i><par n="robo/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="kojot">           <i>kojo</i><par n="robo/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="kum">             <i>kum</i><par n="astronom__n"/></e>
<e lm="majordomus">      <i>majordomus</i><par n="astronom__n"/></e>
<e lm="megaloman">       <i>megaloman</i><par n="kretyn__n"/></e>
<e lm="morświn">         <i>morświn</i><par n="rekin__n"/></e>
<e lm="mutant">          <i>mutan</i><par n="robo/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="nawóz">           <i>naw</i><par n="ob/óz__n"/></e>
<e lm="niemowlę">        <i>niemowl</i><par n="zwierz/ę__n"/></e>
<e lm="obóz">            <i>ob</i><par n="ob/óz__n"/></e>
<e lm="oceanograf">      <i>oceanograf</i><par n="astronom__n"/></e>
<e lm="ojciec">          <i>ojc</i><par n="ojc/iec__n"/></e>
<e lm="olbrzym">         <i>olbrzym</i><par n="kretyn__n"/></e>
<e lm="parów">           <i>par</i><par n="cudzysł/ów__n"/></e>
<e lm="pasierb">         <i>pasierb</i><par n="astronom__n"/></e>
<e lm="patriota">        <i>patrio</i><par n="poe/ta__n"/></e>
<e lm="piorun">          <i>piorun</i><par n="rekin__n"/></e>
<e lm="pisklę">          <i>piskl</i><par n="zwierz/ę__n"/></e>
<e lm="podwóz">          <i>podw</i><par n="ob/óz__n"/></e>
<e lm="poeta">           <i>poe</i><par n="poe/ta__n"/></e>
<e lm="połów">           <i>poł</i><par n="cudzysł/ów__n"/></e>
<e lm="prosię">          <i>prosi</i><par n="zwierz/ę__n"/></e>
<e lm="przewóz">         <i>przew</i><par n="ob/óz__n"/></e>
<e lm="rów">             <i>r</i><par n="cudzysł/ów__n"/></e>
<e lm="robot">           <i>robo</i><par n="robo/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="scenograf">       <i>scenograf</i><par n="astronom__n"/></e>
<e lm="szarlatan">       <i>szarlatan</i><par n="kretyn__n"/></e>
<e lm="szczenię">        <i>szczeni</i><par n="zwierz/ę__n"/></e>
<e lm="sęp">             <i>sęp</i><par n="rekin__n"/></e>
<e lm="tytan">           <i>tytan</i><par n="kretyn__n"/></e>
<e lm="wóz">             <i>w</i><par n="ob/óz__n"/></e>
<e lm="wwóz">            <i>ww</i><par n="ob/óz__n"/></e>
<e lm="wywóz">           <i>wyw</i><par n="ob/óz__n"/></e>
<e lm="wąwóz">           <i>wąw</i><par n="ob/óz__n"/></e>
<e lm="zwierzę">         <i>zwierz</i><par n="zwierz/ę__n"/></e>
<e lm="źrebię">          <i>źrebi</i><par n="zwierz/ę__n"/></e>
<e lm="Adam">            <i>Adam</i><par n="Adam__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jan">             <i>Jan</i><par n="Adam__np"/></e>
<e lm="Filip">           <i>Filip</i><par n="Adam__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jakub">           <i>Jakub</i><par n="Adam__np"/></e>
<e lm="Józef">           <i>Józef</i><par n="Adam__np"/></e>
<e lm="Krzysztof">       <i>Krzysztof</i><par n="Adam__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marcin">          <i>Marcin</i><par n="Adam__np"/></e>
<e lm="Stanisław">       <i>Stanisław</i><par n="Adam__np"/></e>
<e lm="karp">            <i>karp</i><par n="rekin__n"/></e>
<e lm="kret">            <i>kre</i><par n="robo/t__n"/></e>
<e lm="powóz">           <i>pow</i><par n="ob/óz__n"/></e>
